src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON INFL-ODD
! Finite
          +Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs:                I-odd-V           ;
          +Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt:                II-odd-V          ;
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg1:ittja%>v        K-CONS            ;
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg2:ittja%>         K-VOW             ;
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg3:isj%>           K-CONS            ;
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Du1:ittji%>n        K-CONS            ;
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Du2:ittja%>bihtte%> K-VOW             ;
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Du3:ittja%>ba       K-VOW             ;
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl1:ittja%>p        K-CONS            ;
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2:ittja%>bihti%>t K-CONS            ;
 +Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2+Err/Orth:ittja%>behti%>t K-CONS            ; !
          +Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3:ittji%>         K-VOW             ;
        +Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2:a               ENDLEX            ;
            +Gram/3syll+Imprt:                IMP7-ODD          ;
          +Gram/3syll+ImprtII:u               IMP8-ODD          ;
! Infinite
              +Gram/3syll+Inf:it              K-CONS            ;
           +Gram/3syll+PrfPrc:am              K-CONS            ;
           +Gram/3syll+PrsPrc:                PRSPRCODD         ; ! as nouns
              +Gram/3syll+Ger:attijn          K-CONS            ;
              +Gram/3syll+Sup:ittjat          K-CONS            ;
           +Gram/3syll+VAbess:ik              K-CONS            ;
           +Gram/3syll+VAbess:ik              VUOHTA            ;
             +Gram/3syll+VGen:a               K-VOW             ;
       +Gram/3syll+Ind+ConNeg:a               K-VOW             ;
       +Gram/3syll+Pot+ConNeg:ittja%>         K-VOW             ; !tentative
     +Gram/3syll+Imprt+ConNeg:a               K-VOW             ;
   +Gram/3syll+ImprtII+ConNeg:                ImprtIIConNeg-ODD ;
        +Gram/3syll+Actio+Nom:ibme            K-VOW             ;
 +Gram/3syll+Actio+Gen+Use/NG:im              K-CONS            ;
        +Gram/3syll+Actio+Gen:ime             K-VOW             ;
        +Gram/3syll+Actio+Com:imijn           K-CONS            ;
 +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess+Use/NG:ime             K-VOW             ;
        +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess:imen            K-CONS            ;
        +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela:imes            K-CONS            ;


LEXICON INFL-ODD-OADDÁDIT !Oaddádit is first oaddát, so prsprc oaddádiddje is Use/-Spell because oaddát should get oaddájiddje, not oaddáDiddje.
! Finite
           +Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs:                I-odd-V       ;
           +Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt:                II-odd-V      ;
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg1:ittja%>v        K-CONS        ;
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg2:ittja%>         K-VOW         ;
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg3:isj%>           K-CONS        ;
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Du1:ittji%>n        K-CONS        ;
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Du2:ittja%>bihtte%> K-VOW         ;
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Du3:ittja%>ba       K-VOW         ;
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl1:ittja%>p        K-CONS        ;
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2:ittja%>bihti%>t K-VOW         ;
  +Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2+Err/Orth:ittja%>behti%>t K-CONS        ; !
           +Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3:ittji%>         K-VOW         ;
         +Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2:a               ENDLEX        ;
             +Gram/3syll+Imprt:                IMP7-ODD      ;
           +Gram/3syll+ImprtII:u               IMP8-ODD      ;
! Infinite
               +Gram/3syll+Inf:it              K-CONS        ;
            +Gram/3syll+PrfPrc:am              K-CONS        ;
 +Gram/3syll+PrsPrc+Use/-Spell:                PRSPRCODD     ; ! as nouns
               +Gram/3syll+Ger:attijn          K-CONS        ;
               +Gram/3syll+Sup:ittjat          K-CONS        ;
            +Gram/3syll+VAbess:ik              K-CONS        ;
            +Gram/3syll+VAbess:ik              VUOHTA        ;
              +Gram/3syll+VGen:a               K-VOW         ;
        +Gram/3syll+Ind+ConNeg:a               K-VOW         ;
        +Gram/3syll+Pot+ConNeg:ittja%>         K-VOW         ; !tentative
      +Gram/3syll+Imprt+ConNeg:a               K-VOW         ;
    +Gram/3syll+ImprtII+ConNeg:                ImprtIIConNeg ;
         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Nom:ibme            K-VOW         ;
         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Gen:im              K-CONS        ;
         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Gen:ime             K-VOW         ;
         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Com:imijn           K-CONS        ;
  +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess+Use/NG:ime             K-VOW         ;
         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess:imen            K-CONS        ;
         +Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela:imes            K-CONS        ;



LEXICON INFL-CONTRACTED
! Finite
        +Ind+Prs:         I-contr-V      ;
        +Ind+Prt:         II-contr-V     ;
            +Pot:tj       I-odd-V        ;
      +Imprt+Sg2:         ENDLEX         ;
      +Imprt+Du2:jihtte%> ENDLEX         ;
   +Imprt+Pl2+Sh:jit      ENDLEX         ;
      +Imprt+Pl2:jihti%>t ENDLEX         ;
          +Imprt:ji       IMP-CONTRACTED ;
    +ImprtII+Sg2:ju       ENDLEX         ;
    +ImprtII+Du2:juhtu%>  ENDLEX         ;
    +ImprtII+Pl2:juhtu%>t ENDLEX         ;
        +ImprtII:ju       IMP-CONTRACTED ;
! Infinite
            +Inf:t        K-CONS              ;
         +PrfPrc:m        K-CONS              ;
         +PrsPrc:         PRSPRCCONTR    ;
            +Ger:dijn     K-CONS              ;
            +Sup:tjit     K-CONS              ;
         +VAbess:k        K-CONS              ;
!         +VAbess:dak      K-CONS              ;
         +VAbess:k        VUOHTA         ;
!         +VAbess:dak      VUOHTA         ;
           +VGen:         K-VOW              ;
     +Ind+ConNeg:         K-VOW              ;
     +Pot+ConNeg:tja      K-VOW              ; !tentative
   +Imprt+ConNeg:         K-VOW              ;
 +ImprtII+ConNeg:j        ImprtIIConNeg  ;
      +Actio+Nom:m        K-CONS              ;
      +Actio+Gen:ma       K-VOW              ;
      +Actio+Com:mijn     K-CONS              ;
      +Actio+Ess:min      K-CONS              ;
      +Actio+Ela:mis      K-CONS              ;





! Intermediate suffix lexica
! --------------------------

! These intermediate lexica are here for
! morphophonological reasons.

LEXICON I-even-V
 :Q2 I-sg72     ; ! Q2 governs WeG and e:á
 :Y2 I-sg9      ; ! Y2 gives á in sg9 of verbs
     I-du83pl72 ; ! No diacritic, no stem changes
 :Y1 I-du7pl9   ; ! Y1 deletes stem vowels in front of j

LEXICON I-diehtet-V
 :á%>Q1 I-sg72     ;
 :á%>   I-sg9      ;
 :e%>   I-du83pl72 ;
 :%>    I-du7pl9   ;

LEXICON II-even-V
 :Y1 II-sg72pl9 ; ! Y1 deletes stem vowels in front of j
 :Q1 II-other   ; ! Q1, WeG. Q1 deletes stem vow bef. j
! Y1 does not give WeG as Q1 does, therefore the split

LEXICON I-o-V
 :Q2 I-sg72      ; ! Q2 governs WeG and e:á
 :Y2 I-sg9       ; ! Y2 gives á in sg9 of verbs
     I-du83pl72  ; ! No diacritic, no stem changes
 :Y1 I-du7pl9-o- ; ! Y1 deletes stem vowels in front of j

LEXICON II-o-V
 :Y1 II-sg72pl9-o- ; ! Y1 deletes stem vowels in front of j
 :Q1 II-other      ; ! Q1, WeG. Q1 deletes stem vow bef. j
! Y1 does not give WeG as Q1 does, therefore the split

LEXICON II-odd-V
    II-sg72pl9 ;
 :i II-other   ;

LEXICON I-contr-V
    I-sg72     ;
    I-sg9      ;
    I-du83pl72 ;
 :j I-du7pl9   ;

LEXICON II-contr-V
 :j II-sg72pl9 ;
    II-other   ; !w/o j, since j in target lexicon



! Final suffix lexica
! -------------------

! Suffix series I
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON I-sg72
  +Sg1:v             K-CONS ;
  +Sg2:              K-VOW ;
  +Sg2+Qst:k    K-CONS ; ! used instead of "gus". So far only for Sg2 and Pres (Inga can only think of sg2 pres båråk, vuojnák, diedák osv)

LEXICON I-sg9
 +Sg3: K-VOW ;

LEXICON I-du83pl72
         +Du2:bihtte%> K-VOW ;
         +Du3:ba       K-VOW ;
         +Pl1:p        K-CONS ;
         +Pl2:bihti%>t K-CONS ;
      +Pl2+Sh:bi%>t K-CONS ;
 +Pl2+Err/Orth:behti%>t K-CONS ; !

LEXICON I-du7pl9
 +Du1:in K-CONS ;
 +Pl3:i  K-VOW ;
 
