src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
ståhkat+V+Err/Orth+IV+Ind+Prs:stoahka I-even-V ;
ståhkat+V+Err/Orth+IV+Ind+Prt:stoahka II-even-V;
